West Virginia, session 2026, HB4306.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Osteopathic Medicine. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on March 27, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-14-14 of this code, relating to the Board of Osteopathic Medicine (emergency temporary permits to practice during States of Emergency or States of Preparedness, 24 CSR 09), is authorized.